Tennessee, session 114, HB0981.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-418(a), is amended by
redesignating the existing language as subdivision (a)(1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (a)(2):
(A) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(1), it is not an offense for a person to
possess in an amount less than one (1) ounce (28.35 grams) or possess five (5) or
fewer marijuana plants. It is also not an offense for a person to casually exchange a
small amount of marijuana not in excess of one-tenth of one (0.1) ounce (2.835 grams).
(B) As used in this subdivision (a)(2):
(i) "Casually exchange" means the spontaneous passing of a small
amount of marijuana that does not involve, in exchange for the marijuana, the
payment of money or a gift card, debit card, credit card, or any other card,
coupon, or token that is capable of being exchanged for money, merchandise, or
goods; and
(ii) "Marijuana" means marijuana in the form of a plant and does not
mean marijuana in any other form, including, but not limited to, a resin,
compound, derivative, concentrate, or oil.
(C) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(2)(A), a municipality, including a county with
a metropolitan form of government, may establish by ordinance that a person who, in a
public place, possesses or casually exchanges an amount of marijuana described in
HB0981
003136
- 1 -

subdivision (a)(2)(A) or who possesses five (5) or fewer marijuana plants that are not
concealed from public view commits a violation that is subject to a civil penalty not to
exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to be calculated at twenty-five dollars ($25.00)
per one-tenth of one (0.1) ounce (2.835 grams) and fifty dollars ($50.00) per plant.
(D) Notwithstanding subdivision (a)(2)(A), a county by resolution of its county
legislative body may establish that a person who, in a public place that is not within the
corporate boundaries of a municipality, possesses or casually exchanges an amount of
marijuana described in subdivision (a)(2)(A) or who possesses five (5) or fewer
marijuana plants that are not concealed from public view commits a violation that is
subject to a civil penalty not to exceed two hundred fifty dollars ($250) to be calculated at
twenty-five dollars ($25.00) per one-tenth of one (0.1) ounce (2.835 grams) and fifty
dollars ($50.00) per plant.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-418, is amended by deleting
subsection (b) and substituting:
(b) It is an offense for a person to sell or distribute marijuana in an amount less
than one (1) ounce (28.35 grams).
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-418(d), is amended by deleting
the language "A violation of subsections (a) or (b)" and substituting the language "A violation of
subdivision (a)(1) or subsection (b)".
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 39-17-417(g)(1), is amended by
deleting the language "one-half (½) ounce (14.175 grams)" and substituting the language "one
(1) ounce (28.35 grams)".
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 003136